Hawaii statutes.
[§171-49.7] Public lands suitable and
available for residential development; inventory. The department of land
and natural resources shall complete and maintain a current inventory of all
public lands placed in the urban district by the land use commission under
chapter 205 which are or may be suitable and available for residential
development. This inventory shall be updated at the end of each quarter and
shall contain the following information: the island and area in which the land
is situated, the acreage, and such other information which the department
determines may be necessary to identify and inventory the land. [L 1977, c 63,
§1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next